Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0456.
People of the State of Michigan enact: TITLE An act to prescribe the senior or vulnerable adult medical alert as the official response to reports of certain missing persons; to provide for the broadcast of information regarding those incidents; to provide for certain civil immunity; and to provide for the powers and duties of certain state and local governmental officers and entities. Sec. 5. (1) After obtaining the information identified in section 3, the law enforcement agency shall as soon as practicable forward that information to all of the following: (a) All law enforcement agencies that have jurisdiction in the location where the missing senior or vulnerable adult resides and all law enforcement agencies that have jurisdiction in the location where the missing senior or vulnerable adult was last seen. (b) All law enforcement agencies to which the person who made the notification concerning the missing senior or vulnerable adult requests the report be sent, if the law enforcement agency determines that the request is reasonable in light of the information received. (c) All law enforcement agencies that request a copy of the report. (d) One or more broadcasters that broadcast in an area where the missing senior or vulnerable adult may be located. (2) Upon the completion of the report required under section 3, a law enforcement agency may forward a copy of the contents of the report to 1 or more newspapers distributed in an area where the missing senior or vulnerable adult may be located. (3) After forwarding the contents of the report to a broadcaster or newspaper under this section, the law enforcement agency shall request that the broadcaster or newspaper do both of the following: (a) Notify the public that there is a missing senior or vulnerable adult medical alert. (b) Broadcast or publish a description of the missing senior or vulnerable adult and any other relevant information that would assist in locating the missing senior or vulnerable adult. (4) The department of state police shall establish and maintain the missing senior or vulnerable adult medical alert system plan. (5) The missing senior or vulnerable adult medical alert system plan under subsection (4) must be designed to rapidly disseminate useful information in a predetermined manner to wireless devices through the existing wireless emergency medical alert system operated under federal law. (6) The missing senior or vulnerable adult medical alert system plan under subsection (4) may be activated only after a report is completed under section 3 and only in accordance with the policies established by the department of state police. (7) Upon the completion of the report required under section 3, a law enforcement agency shall notify the department of state police of the missing senior or vulnerable adult and request that a medical alert be issued under the missing senior or vulnerable adult medical alert system plan. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor